dictionaries/az.dic
azerbaijani/MBM2H2X2HY
adaq/MAM1H1X1HX
ağarmış/MAM1H1X1HX
ağdaş/MAM1H1X1HX
alapaça/MAM1H1X1HX
albatros/MAM3H3X3HZ
aldanma/MAM1H1X1HX
aminoplast/MAM1H1X1HX
anlaşıqlıq/MAM1H1X1HX
anod/MAM3H3X3HZ
aqro/MAM3H3X3HZ
arktika/MAM1H1X1HX
artikul/MAM3H3X3HZ
artmaq/MAM1H1X1HX
astma/MAM1H1X1HX
atbaz/MAM1H1X1HX
avtorluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
axırzaman/MAM1H1X1HX
axma/MAM1H1X1HX
badımcanlıq/MAM1H1X1HX
bağıran/MAM1H1X1HX
baqaclıq/MAM1H1X1HX
barışdırma/MAM1H1X1HX
baron/MAM3H3X3HZ
bataqlaşma/MAM1H1X1HX
bazirdanbaşı/MAM1H1X1HX
beysbolçu/MAM3H3X3HZ
bəyanat/MAM1H1X1HX
biyan/MAM1H1X1HX
boğlama/MAM1H1X1HX
boğuq/MAM3H3X3HZ
boynuyoğun/MAM3H3X3HZ
brombutilkauçuk/MAM3H3X3HZ
budka/MAM1H1X1HX
buntçuluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
buyruqçu/MAM3H3X3HZ
buzluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
çamaşırxana/MAM1H1X1HX
çarpışan/MAM1H1X1HX
cəza/MAM1H1X1HX
ciqa/MAM1H1X1HX
cırtqozluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
çoşqalama/MAM1H1X1HX
çoxlu/MAM3H3X3HZ
cuş/MAM3H3X3HZ
damcı/MAM1H1X1HX
damğavuran/MAM1H1X1HX
dayanmaq/MAM1H1X1HX
dazlıq/MAM1H1X1HX
despot/MAM3H3X3HZ
dəmtutan/MAM1H1X1HX
difteriya/MAM1H1X1HX
diktafon/MAM3H3X3HZ
dispersiya/MAM1H1X1HX
doktorluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
doldurulma/MAM1H1X1HX
donkixotluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
dublyor/MAM3H3X3HZ
düşbərəxana/MAM1H1X1HX
duzxana/MAM1H1X1HX
ekoloq/MAM3H3X3HZ
eleuterokok/MAM3H3X3HZ
epiqonçuluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
eşqbazlıq/MAM1H1X1HX
eyforiya/MAM1H1X1HX
əməlbaz/MAM1H1X1HX
əsaslar/MAM1H1X1HX
əyriboyun/MAM3H3X3HZ
fəallıq/MAM1H1X1HX
fidan/MAM1H1X1HX
flaminqo/MAM3H3X3HZ
fonoqrafiya/MAM1H1X1HX
fosfat/MAM1H1X1HX
gecəquşu/MAM3H3X3HZ
gimnast/MAM1H1X1HX
gülləboran/MAM1H1X1HX
hayxırma/MAM1H1X1HX
həndbolçu/MAM3H3X3HZ
hərəmağası/MAM1H1X1HX
hokkabaz/MAM1H1X1HX
huşsuzluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
ifaçı/MAM1H1X1HX
ikon/MAM3H3X3HZ
inkvizasiya/MAM1H1X1HX
inkvizitor/MAM3H3X3HZ
inspektor/MAM3H3X3HZ
işğalçılıq/MAM1H1X1HX
islahat/MAM1H1X1HX
ixtiyar/MAM1H1X1HX
izooktan/MAM1H1X1HX
kabus/MAM3H3X3HZ
kandar/MAM1H1X1HX
kart/MAM1H1X1HX
kartofçuluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
kenquru/MAM3H3X3HZ
kinoqurğu/MAM3H3X3HZ
kitabsatan/MAM1H1X1HX
knyazlıq/MAM1H1X1HX
komisyon/MAM3H3X3HZ
konqlomerasiya/MAM1H1X1HX
kontorka/MAM1H1X1HX
kontrolçu/MAM3H3X3HZ
kovboy/MAM3H3X3HZ
krallıq/MAM1H1X1HX
kvarteron/MAM3H3X3HZ
kvintessensiya/MAM1H1X1HX
lampoçka/MAM1H1X1HX
lüzumsuzluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
mac/MAM1H1X1HX
maça/MAM1H1X1HX
Mars/MAM1H1X1HX
maskalama/MAM1H1X1HX
mayaotu/MAM3H3X3HZ
meşəşünas/MAM1H1X1HX
məcmu/MAM3H3X3HZ
məcra/MAM1H1X1HX
məram/MAM1H1X1HX
mərtub/MAM3H3X3HZ
minomyot/MAM3H3X3HZ
mismar/MAM1H1X1HX
mitra/MAM1H1X1HX
morq/MAM3H3X3HZ
muflon/MAM3H3X3HZ
muşqurma/MAM1H1X1HX
naməlumluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
nardan/MAM1H1X1HX
nəməkdan/MAM1H1X1HX
niqrol/MAM3H3X3HZ
nişançı/MAM1H1X1HX
oğulluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
okklüziya/MAM1H1X1HX
oktant/MAM1H1X1HX
otyığan/MAM1H1X1HX
ovsun/MAM3H3X3HZ
oxatan/MAM1H1X1HX
paltaryuyan/MAM1H1X1HX
parol/MAM3H3X3HZ
partiyaçı/MAM1H1X1HX
paz/MAM1H1X1HX
pion/MAM3H3X3HZ
pironaft/MAM1H1X1HX
pıxtalaşma/MAM1H1X1HX
porno/MAM3H3X3HZ
professura/MAM1H1X1HX
proton/MAM3H3X3HZ
qaboyçalan/MAM1H1X1HX
qalayçı/MAM1H1X1HX
qanunauyğunluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
qarabuğdayı/MAM1H1X1HX
qardaşarvadı/MAM1H1X1HX
qaşıqdolusu/MAM3H3X3HZ
qasnaq/MAM1H1X1HX
qazlaşdırılma/MAM1H1X1HX
qəbulçu/MAM3H3X3HZ
qılınc/MAM1H1X1HX
qızılxallı/MAM1H1X1HX
qızışdırıcı/MAM1H1X1HX
qlikol/MAM3H3X3HZ
qorxu/MAM3H3X3HZ
qravüraçılıq/MAM1H1X1HX
qu/MAM3H3X3HZ
qum/MAM3H3X3HZ
qurs/MAM3H3X3HZ
qutan/MAM1H1X1HX
quyruq/MAM3H3X3HZ
refraktor/MAM3H3X3HZ
rentgenoterapiya/MAM1H1X1HX
rəngsaz/MAM1H1X1HX
rotor/MAM3H3X3HZ
şah/MAM1H1X1HX
sallatma/MAM1H1X1HX
şaqul/MAM3H3X3HZ
sardina/MAM1H1X1HX
senat/MAM1H1X1HX
sevda/MAM1H1X1HX
şifon/MAM3H3X3HZ
siloksan/MAM1H1X1HX
sıra/MAM1H1X1HX
sıxcamlıq/MAM1H1X1HX
sol/MAM3H3X3HZ
soyğun/MAM3H3X3HZ
spiral/MAM1H1X1HX
stol/MAM3H3X3HZ
stul/MAM3H3X3HZ
süqut/MAM3H3X3HZ
suvarma/MAM1H1X1HX
tarac/MAM1H1X1HX
tavot/MAM3H3X3HZ
tavtalogiya/MAM1H1X1HX
təqsirkar/MAM1H1X1HX
tiryəkbaz/MAM1H1X1HX
toğlu/MAM3H3X3HZ
torta/MAM1H1X1HX
toxluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
tromb/MAM3H3X3HZ
turşuma/MAM1H1X1HX
tutumluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
tuvalı/MAM1H1X1HX
ultramikroskop/MAM3H3X3HZ
uzlaşma/MAM1H1X1HX
vapor/MAM3H3X3HZ
velbot/MAM3H3X3HZ
vışka/MAM1H1X1HX
vurğunluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
xeyməgah/MAM1H1X1HX
xəstəxana/MAM1H1X1HX
xoşu/MAM3H3X3HZ
yal/MAM1H1X1HX
yaramazlıq/MAM1H1X1HX
yarımseksiya/MAM1H1X1HX
yemişan/MAM1H1X1HX
yodsuzluq/MAM3H3X3HZ
yolpulu/MAM3H3X3HZ
zökəmotu/MAM3H3X3HZ
zoopark/MAM1H1X1HX
zorlama/MAM1H1X1HX
